Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.01, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Cannabis business. "Cannabis business" means any of the following licensed under this chapter: (1) cannabis microbusiness; (2) cannabis mezzobusiness; (3) cannabis cultivator; (4) cannabis manufacturer; (5) cannabis retailer; (6) cannabis wholesaler; (7) cannabis transporter; (8) cannabis testing facility; (9) cannabis event organizer; (10) cannabis delivery service; and (11) deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.01, subdivision 48, is amended to read: Subd. 48. License holder. "License holder" means a person, cooperative, or business that holds any of the following licenses: (1) cannabis microbusiness; (2) cannabis mezzobusiness; (3) cannabis cultivator; (4) cannabis manufacturer; (5) cannabis retailer; (6) cannabis wholesaler; (7) cannabis transporter; (8) cannabis testing facility; (9) cannabis event organizer; (10) cannabis delivery service; (11) lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer; (12) lower-potency hemp edible wholesaler; (13) lower-potency hemp edible retailer; or (14) deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.01, subdivision 52, is amended to read: Subd. 52. Medical cannabinoid product. (a) "Medical cannabinoid product" means a new text begin cannabis new text end product thatdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) consists of or contains cannabis concentrate or hemp concentrate or is infused with cannabinoids, including but not limited to artificially derived cannabinoids; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end is provided to a patient enrolled in the registry program; new text begin a visiting patient; new text end a registered designated caregiver; or a parent, legal guardian, or spouse of an enrolled patient, by a registered designated caregiver, cannabis retailer, or cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement to treat or alleviate the symptoms of a qualifying medical condition. deleted text begin (b) A medical cannabinoid product must be in the form of: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) liquid, including but not limited to oil; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) pill; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) liquid or oil for use with a vaporized delivery method; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) water-soluble cannabinoid multiparticulate, including granules, powder, and sprinkles; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) orally dissolvable product, including lozenges, gum, mints, buccal tablets, and sublingual tablets; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) edible products in the form of gummies and chews; deleted text end deleted text begin (7) topical formulation; or deleted text end deleted text begin (8) any allowable form or delivery method approved by the office. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) Medical cannabinoid product does not include adult-use cannabis products or hemp-derived consumer products. deleted text end new text begin (b) A medical cannabinoid product may contain hemp concentrate or may be infused with cannabinoids derived from hemp. A medical cannabinoid product is not subject to potency limits established by the office in rule. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.01, subdivision 54, is amended to read: Subd. 54. Medical cannabis flower. "Medical cannabis flower" means cannabis flower provided to a patient enrolled in the registry program or a visiting patient; a registered designated caregiver; or a parent, legal guardian, or spouse of an enrolled patient by a registered designated caregiver, cannabis retailer, or cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement to treat or alleviate the symptoms of a qualifying medical condition. deleted text begin Medical cannabis flower does not include adult-use cannabis flower.deleted text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.09, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Home extraction of cannabis concentrate by use of volatile solvent prohibited. No person may use a volatile solvent to separate or extract cannabis concentrate or hemp concentrate without a cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, new text begin cannabis macrobusiness, new text end cannabis manufacturer, deleted text begin medical cannabis combination business,deleted text end or lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer license issued under this chapter. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.10, is amended to read: 342.10 LICENSES; TYPES. The office shall issue the following types of license: (1) cannabis microbusiness; (2) cannabis mezzobusiness; (3) cannabis cultivator; (4) cannabis manufacturer; (5) cannabis retailer; (6) cannabis wholesaler; (7) cannabis transporter; (8) cannabis testing facility; (9) cannabis event organizer; (10) cannabis delivery service; (11) lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer; (12) lower-potency hemp edible wholesaler; (13) lower-potency hemp edible retailer; and (14) deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.11, is amended to read: 342.11 LICENSES; FEES. (a) The office shall require the payment of application fees, initial licensing fees, and renewal licensing fees as provided in this section. The initial license fee shall include the fee for initial issuance of the license and the first annual renewal. The renewal fee shall be charged at the time of the second renewal and each subsequent annual renewal thereafter. Nothing in this section prohibits a local unit of government from charging the retailer registration fee established in section 342.22. Application fees, initial licensing fees, and renewal licensing fees are nonrefundable. (b) Application and licensing fees shall be as follows: (1) for a cannabis microbusiness: (i) an application fee of $500; (ii) an initial license fee of $0; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $2,000; (2) for a cannabis mezzobusiness: (i) an application fee of $5,000; (ii) an initial license fee of $5,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $10,000; (3) for a cannabis cultivator: (i) an application fee of $10,000; (ii) an initial license fee of $20,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $30,000; (4) for a cannabis manufacturer: (i) an application fee of $10,000; (ii) an initial license fee of $10,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $20,000; (5) for a cannabis retailer: (i) an application fee of $2,500; (ii) an initial license fee of $2,500; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $5,000; (6) for a cannabis wholesaler: (i) an application fee of $5,000; (ii) an initial license fee of $5,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $10,000; (7) for a cannabis transporter: (i) an application fee of $250; (ii) an initial license fee of $500; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $1,000; (8) for a cannabis testing facility: (i) an application fee of $5,000; (ii) an initial license fee of $5,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $10,000; (9) for a cannabis delivery service: (i) an application fee of $250; (ii) an initial license fee of $500; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $1,000; (10) for a cannabis event organizer: (i) an application fee of $750; and (ii) an initial license fee of $750; (11) for a lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer: (i) an application fee of $250; (ii) an initial license fee of $1,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $1,000; (12) for a lower-potency hemp edible wholesaler: (i) an application fee of $250; (ii) an initial license fee of $10,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $10,000; (13) for a lower-potency hemp edible retailer: (i) an application fee of $250 or, if the lower-potency hemp retailer operates more than one retail location, $250 per retail location; (ii) an initial license fee of $250 or, if the lower-potency hemp retailer operates more than one retail location, $250 per retail location; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $250 or, if the lower-potency hemp retailer operates more than one retail location, $250 per retail location; and (14) for a deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end : (i) an application fee of $10,000; (ii) an initial license fee of $20,000; and (iii) a renewal license fee of $70,000. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.12, is amended to read: 342.12 LICENSES; TRANSFERS; ADJUSTMENTS. (a) Licenses issued under this chapter that are available to all applicants pursuant to section 342.14, subdivision 1b, paragraph (c), may be freely transferred subject to the prior written approval of the office unless the license holder has not received a final site inspection or the license holder is a social equity applicant. (b) Licenses issued as social equity licenses pursuant to either section 342.14, subdivision 1b, paragraph (b), or section 342.175, paragraph (b), may only be transferred to another social equity applicant for three years after the date on which the office issues the license. Three years after the date of issuance, a license holder may transfer a license to any entity. Transfer of a license that was issued as a social equity license must be reviewed by the Division of Social Equity and is subject to the prior written approval of the office. (c) Preliminary license approval issued pursuant to section 342.14, subdivision 5, may not be transferred. (d) A new license must be obtained when: (1) the form of the deleted text begin licensee'sdeleted text end new text begin license holder's new text end legal business structure converts or changes to a different type of legal business structure; or (2) the deleted text begin licenseedeleted text end new text begin license holder new text end dissolves; consolidates; reorganizes; undergoes bankruptcy, insolvency, or receivership proceedings; merges with another legal organization; or assigns all or substantially all of its assets for the benefit of creditors. (e) Licenses must be renewed annually. (f) deleted text begin License holders may petition the office to adjust the tier of a license issued within a license category if the license holder meets all applicable requirementsdeleted text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2027, the office may determine whether licenses are available for a license holder that is a cannabis microbusiness or cannabis mezzobusiness to reclassify the license holder as another type of business, either as a cannabis mezzobusiness or cannabis macrobusiness. Applicants for cannabis macrobusiness licenses are subject to the requirements of section 342.18. If the office determines that licenses are available subject to section 342.14, subdivision 1a, the office must announce the number of available cannabis mezzobusiness licenses and cannabis macrobusiness licenses and the date on which the office will begin accepting petitions from applicants seeking reclassification. When approving reclassification of a license, the office must give priority to: (1) any cannabis microbusiness with a medical retail endorsement that is seeking reclassification; or (2) any cannabis mezzobusiness with a medical endorsement that is seeking reclassification. The number of reclassified licenses available to social equity applicants must be equal to or greater than the number of reclassified licenses available to all applicants. A license holder that seeks to reclassify its license as a cannabis mezzobusiness or cannabis macrobusiness must include in its application a transition plan that describes how the license holder will comply with all statutes and rules applicable to the reclassified license. Reclassification according to this paragraph must not remove the social equity license status from a social equity licensenew text end . (g) The office by rule may permit the relocation of a licensed cannabis business; permit the relocation of an approved operational location, including a cultivation, manufacturing, processing, or retail location; adopt requirements for the submission of a license relocation application; establish standards for the approval of a relocation application; and charge a fee not to exceed $250 for reviewing and processing applications. Relocation of a licensed premises pursuant to this paragraph does not extend or otherwise modify the license term of the license subject to relocation. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.13, is amended to read: 342.13 LOCAL CONTROL. (a) A local unit of government may not prohibit the possession, transportation, or use of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products authorized under this chapter. (b) Except as provided in section 342.22, a local unit of government may not prohibit the establishment or operation of a cannabis business or hemp business licensed under this chapter. (c) A local unit of government may adopt reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of the operation of a cannabis business provided that such restrictions do not prohibit the establishment or operation of cannabis businesses. A local unit of government may prohibit the operation of a cannabis business within 1,000 feet of a school, or 500 feet of a day care, residential treatment facility, or an attraction within a public park that is regularly used by minors, including a playground or athletic field. (d) The office shall work with local units of government to: (1) develop model ordinances for reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of the operation of a cannabis business; (2) develop standardized forms and procedures for the issuance of a retail registration pursuant to section 342.22; and (3) develop model policies and procedures for the performance of compliance checks required under section 342.22. (e) If a local unit of government is conducting studies or has authorized a study to be conducted or has held or has scheduled a hearing for the purpose of considering adoption or amendment of reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of the operation of a cannabis business, the governing body of the local unit of government may adopt an interim ordinance applicable to all or part of its jurisdiction for the purpose of protecting the planning process and the health, safety, and welfare of its citizens. Before adopting the interim ordinance, the governing body must hold a public hearing. The interim ordinance may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the operation of a cannabis business within the jurisdiction or a portion thereof until January 1, 2025. (f) Within 30 days of receiving a copy of an application from the office, a local unit of government shall certify on a form provided by the office whether a proposed cannabis business complies with local zoning ordinances and, if applicable, whether the proposed business complies with the state fire code and building code. The office may not issue a license if the local unit of government informs the office that the cannabis business does not meet local zoning and land use laws. If the local unit of government does not provide the certification to the office within 30 days of receiving a copy of an application from the office, the office may issue a license. (g) The office by rule shall establish an expedited complaint process to receive, review, and respond to complaints made by a local unit of government about a cannabis business. At a minimum, the expedited complaint process shall require the office to provide an initial response to the complaint within seven days and perform any necessary inspections within 30 days. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a local unit of government from enforcing a local ordinance. If a local unit of government notifies the office that a cannabis business other than a cannabis retailer, cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusinessnew text begin , cannabis macrobusiness,new text end or lower-potency hemp edible retailer with a retail operations endorsementdeleted text begin , or medical cannabis combination business operating a retail locationdeleted text end poses an immediate threat to the health or safety of the public, the office must respond within one business day and may take any action described in section 342.19 or 342.21. (h) A local government unit that issues a cannabis retailer registration under section 342.22 may, by ordinance, limit the number of licensed cannabis retailers, cannabis mezzobusinesses with a retail operations endorsement, and cannabis microbusinesses with a retail operations endorsement to no fewer than one registration for every 12,500 residents. (i) If a county has one active registration for every 12,500 residents, a city or town within the county is not obligated to register a cannabis business. (j) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local government unit from allowing licensed cannabis retailers in excess of the minimums set in paragraph (h). (k) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the state shall not issue a license to any cannabis business to operate in Indian country, as defined in United States Code, title 18, section 1151, of a Minnesota Tribal government without the consent of the Tribal government. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.175, is amended to read: 342.175 SOCIAL EQUITY LICENSE CLASSIFICATION. (a) The office must classify licenses listed in section 342.10, clauses (1) to (10) and deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end as: (1) available to social equity applicants who meet the requirements of section 342.17; and (2) available to all applicants. (b) The office must classify any license issued to a social equity applicant as a social equity license. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.18, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Vertical integration prohibited; exceptions. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the office shall not issue licenses to a single applicant that would result in the applicant being vertically integrated in violation of the provisions of this chapter. (b) Nothing in this section prohibits or limits the issuance of microbusiness licenses, mezzobusiness licenses, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end licenses, or the issuance of lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, lower-potency hemp edible wholesaler, and lower-potency hemp edible retailer licenses to the same person or entity. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.22, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Registration required. Before making retail sales to customers or patients, a cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis retailer, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end , or lower-potency hemp edible retailer must register with the city, town, or county in which the retail establishment is located. A county may issue a registration in cases where a city or town has provided consent for the county to issue the registration for the jurisdiction. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.22, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Issuance of registration. (a) A local unit of government shall issue a retail registration to a cannabis microbusiness with a retail operations endorsement, cannabis mezzobusiness with a retail operations endorsement, cannabis retailer, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end operating a retail location, or lower-potency hemp edible retailer that: (1) has a valid license or preliminary license approval issued by the office; (2) has paid the registration fee or renewal fee pursuant to subdivision 2; (3) is found to be in compliance with the requirements of this chapter at any preliminary compliance check that the local unit of government performs; and (4) if applicable, is current on all property taxes and assessments at the location where the retail establishment is located. (b) Before issuing a retail registration, the local unit of government may conduct a preliminary compliance check to ensure that the cannabis business or hemp business is in compliance with any applicable local ordinance established pursuant to section 342.13. (c) A local unit of government shall renew the retail registration of a cannabis business or hemp business when the office renews the license of the cannabis business or hemp business. (d) A retail registration issued under this section may not be transferred. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.22, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Registration suspension and cancellation; notice to office; penalties. (a) If a local unit of government determines that a cannabis business or hemp business with a retail registration issued by the local unit of government is not operating in compliance with the requirements of a local ordinance authorized under section 342.13 or that the operation of the business poses an immediate threat to the health or safety of the public, the local unit of government may suspend the retail registration of the cannabis business or hemp business. The local unit of government must immediately notify the office of the suspension and shall include a description of the grounds for the suspension. (b) The office shall review the retail registration suspension and may order reinstatement of the retail registration or take any action described in section 342.19 or 342.21. (c) The retail registration suspension must be for up to 30 days unless the office suspends the license and operating privilege of the cannabis business or hemp business for a longer period or revokes the license. (d) The local unit of government may reinstate the retail registration if the local unit of government determines that any violation has been cured. The local unit of government must reinstate the retail registration if the office orders reinstatement. (e) No cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis retailer, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end , or lower-potency hemp edible retailer may make any sale to a customer or patient without a valid retail registration with a local unit of government and a valid license with any applicable endorsement from the office. A local unit of government may impose a civil penalty of up to $2,000 for each violation of this paragraph. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.27, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Prohibitions. A cannabis business with a license or endorsement authorizing the retail sale of cannabis flower or cannabis products shall not: (1) sell cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to a person who is visibly intoxicated; (2) knowingly sell more cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products than a customer is legally permitted to possess; (3) give away immature cannabis plants or seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products; (4) operate a drive-through window; (5) allow for the dispensing of cannabis plants, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products in vending machines; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (6) sell cannabis plants, cannabis flower, or cannabis products if the cannabis retailer knows that any required security or statewide monitoring systems are not operationaldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (7) sell medical cannabinoid products to a person who is not registered in the patient registry or is not enrolled in the registry program as a patient or caregiver. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.35, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. A cannabis transporter license entitles the license holder to transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products from cannabis microbusinesses, cannabis mezzobusinesses, new text begin cannabis macrobusinesses, new text end cannabis cultivators, cannabis manufacturers, cannabis wholesalers, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturers, and industrial hemp growers to cannabis microbusinesses, cannabis mezzobusinesses, new text begin cannabis macrobusinesses, new text end cannabis manufacturers, cannabis testing facilities, cannabis wholesalers, cannabis retailers, new text begin and new text end lower-potency hemp edible retailersdeleted text begin , and medical cannabis combination businessesdeleted text end and perform other actions approved by the office. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.37, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. A cannabis testing facility license entitles the license holder to obtain and test immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products from cannabis microbusinesses, cannabis mezzobusinesses, new text begin cannabis macrobusinesses, new text end cannabis cultivators, cannabis manufacturers, cannabis wholesalers, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturers, deleted text begin medical cannabis combination businesses,deleted text end and industrial hemp growers. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.40, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Cannabis event sales. (a) Cannabis microbusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis mezzobusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis retailers, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessesdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessesnew text end operating a retail location, and lower-potency hemp edible retailers, including the cannabis event organizer, may be authorized to sell cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products to customers at a cannabis event. (b) All sales of cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products at a cannabis event must take place in a retail area as designated in the premises diagram. (c) Authorized retailers may only conduct sales within their specifically assigned area. (d) Authorized retailers must verify the age of all customers pursuant to section 342.27, subdivision 4, before completing a sale and may not sell cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to an individual under 21 years of age. (e) Authorized retailers may display one sample of each type of cannabis plant, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, and hemp-derived consumer product available for sale. Samples of adult-use cannabis and adult-use cannabis products must be stored in a sample jar or display case and be accompanied by a label or notice containing the information required to be affixed to the packaging or container containing adult-use cannabis flower and adult-use cannabis products sold to customers. A sample may not consist of more than eight grams of adult-use cannabis flower or adult-use cannabis concentrate, or an edible cannabis product infused with more than 100 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol. A cannabis retailer may allow customers to smell the adult-use cannabis flower or adult-use cannabis product before purchase. (f) The notice requirements under section 342.27, subdivision 6, apply to authorized retailers offering cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabinoid products, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale at a cannabis event. (g) Authorized retailers may not: (1) sell adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to a person who is visibly intoxicated; (2) knowingly sell more cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products than a customer is legally permitted to possess; (3) sell medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products; or (4) allow for the dispensing of cannabis plants, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products in vending machines. (h) Except for samples of a cannabis plant, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, and hemp-derived consumer product, all cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale at a cannabis event must be stored in a secure, locked container that is not accessible to the public. Such items being stored at a cannabis event shall not be left unattended. (i) All cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale at a cannabis event must comply with this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding the testing, packaging, and labeling of those items. (j) All cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, and adult-use cannabis products sold, damaged, or destroyed at a cannabis event must be recorded in the statewide monitoring system. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.41, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. A cannabis delivery service license entitles the license holder to purchase cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products from licensed cannabis microbusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis mezzobusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis retailers, and deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessesdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessesnew text end ; transport and deliver cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumable products to customers; and perform other actions approved by the office. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Types of medical cannabis endorsements; authorized actions. new text end new text begin The office may issue the following types of medical cannabis endorsements to a license holder: new text end new text begin (1) a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement; new text end new text begin (2) a medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement; or new text end new text begin (3) a medical cannabis retail endorsement. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Medical cannabis cultivation endorsement. new text end new text begin (a) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis macrobusiness, or cannabis cultivator with a cannabis cultivation endorsement may apply for and obtain a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis business with a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement must: new text end new text begin (1) comply with the requirements of section 342.25; and new text end new text begin (2) otherwise meet all applicable requirements established by the office. new text end new text begin (c) A medical cannabis cultivation endorsement entitles the license holder to perform the actions authorized in section 342.30, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (d) A cannabis microbusiness with a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement may cultivate cannabis in an additional 1,000 square feet indoors or one-quarter acre outdoors in addition to the limits in section 342.28. new text end new text begin (e) A cannabis mezzobusiness with a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement may cultivate cannabis in an additional 3,000 square feet indoors or one-half acre outdoors in addition to the limits in section 342.29. new text end new text begin (f) A cannabis cultivator with a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement may cultivate an additional 6,000 square feet indoors or one acre outdoors in addition to the limits in section 342.30. new text end new text begin (g) Annually, at least one quarter of all cannabis flower cultivated by a cannabis business with a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement must be sold by the license holder to a cannabis business with a medical cannabis endorsement, including the license holder if the license holder has a medical cannabis manufacturing endorsement or medical cannabis retail endorsement. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement. new text end new text begin (a) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis macrobusiness, or cannabis manufacturer with a manufacturing endorsement may apply for and obtain a medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis business with a medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement must: new text end new text begin (1) comply with the requirements of section 342.26; new text end new text begin (2) manufacture high medical needs products identified by the office; and new text end new text begin (3) otherwise meet all applicable requirements established by the office. new text end new text begin (c) A medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement entitles a license holder to: new text end new text begin (1) manufacture medical cannabinoid products; and new text end new text begin (2) sell medical cannabinoid products only to other cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement or medical cannabis retail endorsement. new text end new text begin (d) A medical cannabinoid product must be labeled with a "Minnesota Medical Cannabis" warning symbol and must only be sold to a person, patient, or caregiver enrolled in the registry program or a visiting patient. new text end new text begin (e) A medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement held by a cannabis microbusiness entitles the license holder to increase the use of cannabis by dry weight up to 25 percent above the limit established by the office in rule. new text end new text begin (f) A medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement held by a cannabis mezzobusiness entitles the license holder to increase the use of cannabis by dry weight up to 25 percent above the limit established by the office in rule. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1d. new text end new text begin Medical cannabis retail endorsement. new text end new text begin (a) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis macrobusiness, or cannabis retailer with a retail operations endorsement may apply for and obtain a medical cannabis retail endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement must: new text end new text begin (1) comply with all requirements of this section and section 342.27; new text end new text begin (2) have at least one member of staff who has earned a medical cannabis consultant certificate issued by the office and completed the required training or have at least one member of staff who is a licensed pharmacist under chapter 151; new text end new text begin (3) ensure availability of patient consultations as required under this section; new text end new text begin (4) ensure that patients and caregivers enrolled in the registry program receive priority service; new text end new text begin (5) carry all products identified by the office as high medical need; and new text end new text begin (6) otherwise meet all applicable requirements established by the office. new text end new text begin (c) The office must identify high medical need products and publish a list of all high medical need products on the office's publicly accessible website. new text end new text begin (d) A medical cannabis retail endorsement held by a cannabis business entitles the license holder to perform the actions authorized in section 342.32, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (e) A cannabis microbusiness with a medical retail endorsement may operate one additional retail location in excess of the limit in section 342.28, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), if at least one retail location is located in an area identified by the office as a high medical need area. new text end new text begin (f) A cannabis mezzobusiness with a medical cannabis retail endorsement may operate two additional retail locations in excess of the limit in section 342.29, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), if at least the retail locations are located in an area identified by the office as a high medical need area. new text end new text begin (g) A cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis retail endorsement may operate up to three additional retail locations in excess of the limit established in section 342.32, subdivision 2, if the retail locations are located in an area identified by the office as a high medical need area. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1e. new text end new text begin Additional authorized actions; external transporter endorsement and medical cannabis delivery endorsement. new text end new text begin (a) A cannabis microbusiness or cannabis mezzobusiness with at least two medical cannabis endorsements may apply for and obtain an external transporter endorsement to transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products to other cannabis and hemp businesses if the cannabis business: new text end new text begin (1) provides the office with the information required in section 342.35, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) complies with the requirements of section 342.36. new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement may apply for and obtain a medical cannabis delivery endorsement to deliver medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products to patients enrolled in the registry program; registered designated caregivers; and parents, legal guardians, and spouses of an enrolled patient if the cannabis business: new text end new text begin (1) provides the office with the information required in section 342.41, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) complies with the requirements of subdivisions 2 and 3 and section 342.42. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.51, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Distribution requirements. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end Prior to distribution of medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products to a person enrolled in the registry program, an employee of a cannabis business must: (1) review and confirm the patient's enrollment in the registry program; (2) verify that the person requesting the distribution of medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products is the patientdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end the patient's registered designated caregiverdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or the patient's parent, legal guardian, or spouse using the procedures established by the office; (3) confirm that the patient had a consultation withnew text begin :new text end (i) an employee with a valid medical cannabis consultant certificate issued by the office; or (ii) an employee who is a licensed pharmacist under chapter 151 to determine the proper medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid product, dosage, and paraphernalia for the patient if required under subdivision 3; (4) apply a patient-specific label on the medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid product that includes recommended dosage requirements and other information as required by the office; and (5) provide the patient with any other information required by the office. deleted text begin (b) A cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement may not deliver medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products to a person enrolled in the registry program unless the cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement also holds a cannabis delivery service license. The delivery of medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products are subject to the provisions of section 342.42. deleted text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.515, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 31, sections 89 and 90, is amended to read: 342.515 deleted text begin MEDICALdeleted text end CANNABIS deleted text begin COMBINATION BUSINESSESdeleted text end new text begin MACROBUSINESSESnew text end . Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. deleted text begin (a) A person, cooperative, or business holding a medical cannabis combination business license is prohibited from owning or operating any other cannabis business or hemp business or holding an active registration agreement under section 152.25, subdivision 1. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) A person or business may hold only one medical cannabis combination business license. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (a)new text end A deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusiness new text end licensenew text begin , consistent with the requirements of specific license endorsements approved by the office,new text end entitles the license holder to perform deleted text begin any or all ofdeleted text end the following deleted text begin within the limits established by this sectiondeleted text end new text begin actionsnew text end : (1) grow cannabis plants from seed or immature plant to mature plant deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end harvest adult-use cannabis flower and medical cannabis flower from a mature plantnew text begin , package and label cannabis flower for sale to other cannabis businesses, and sell immature cannabis plants and seedlings and cannabis flower to other cannabis businessesnew text end ; (2) make cannabis concentrate; (3) make hemp concentrate, including hemp concentrate with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of more than 0.3 percent as measured by weight; (4) manufacture artificially derived cannabinoids; deleted text begin (5) manufacture medical cannabinoid products; deleted text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end manufacturenew text begin , package, and labelnew text end adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for public consumption; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end purchase immature cannabis plants and seedlings and cannabis flower from a cannabis microbusiness, a cannabis mezzobusiness, a cannabis manufacturer, a cannabis wholesaler, or another deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end ; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end purchase hemp plant parts and propagules from an industrial hemp grower licensed under chapter 18K; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end purchase cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, and artificially derived cannabinoids from a cannabis microbusiness, a cannabis mezzobusiness, a cannabis manufacturer, a cannabis wholesaler, or another deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end ; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end purchase hemp concentrate from an industrial hemp processor licensed under chapter 18K; deleted text begin (11) manufacture, package, and label medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products for sale to cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis processor endorsement, cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis retail endorsement, other medical cannabis combination businesses, and persons in the registry program; deleted text end deleted text begin (12) transport and deliver medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products to medical cannabis processors, medical cannabis retailers, other medical cannabis combination businesses, patients enrolled in the registry program, registered designated caregivers, and parents, legal guardians, and spouses of an enrolled patient; deleted text end deleted text begin (13) manufacture, package, and label adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale to customers and other cannabis businesses; deleted text end deleted text begin (14) sell medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products to other cannabis businesses with a medical endorsement, other medical cannabis combination businesses, and patients enrolled in the registry program, registered designated caregivers, and parents, legal guardians, and spouses of an enrolled patient; deleted text end deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end sell immature cannabis plants and seedlings, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, and other products authorized by law deleted text begin to other cannabis businesses anddeleted text end to customers; deleted text begin (16) transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, and other products authorized by law to other cannabis businesses; deleted text end deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end sell deleted text begin and transportdeleted text end lower-potency hemp edibles to lower-potency hemp edible retailers and lower-potency hemp edible wholesalers; and deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end perform other actions approved by the office. deleted text begin (d) A medical cannabis combination business is not required to obtain a medical cannabis endorsement to perform any actions authorized under this section. deleted text end new text begin (b) A cannabis macrobusiness must apply for and obtain a medical manufacturing endorsement and at least one other medical cannabis endorsement identified in section 342.51. new text end Subd. 2. Cultivationnew text begin endorsementnew text end ; size limitations. new text begin (a) A cannabis macrobusiness seeking to cultivate cannabis plants and harvest cannabis flower must obtain a cannabis cultivation endorsement and comply with section 342.25. new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis macrobusiness that obtains a cannabis cultivation endorsement must apply for and obtain a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement and comply with section 342.51, subdivision 1b. new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination business may cultivate cannabis to be sold as medical cannabis flower or used in medical cannabinoid products in an area of up to 60,000 square feet of plant canopy subject to the limits on adult-use cannabis cultivation in paragraph (c). A medical cannabis combination business may cultivate cannabis and manufacture cannabis in more than one location, except the aggregate total of plant canopy in all locations must count toward the business' canopy limit.deleted text end new text begin macrobusiness that cultivates cannabis at an indoor facility may cultivate up to 45,000 square feet of plant canopy.new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end deleted text begin may cultivate cannabis to be sold as adult-use cannabis flower or used in adult-use cannabis products in an area authorized by the office as described in paragraph (c).deleted text end new text begin macrobusiness that cultivates cannabis at an outdoor location may cultivate up to four acres of mature, flowering plants.new text end deleted text begin (c) The office shall authorize a medical cannabis combination business to cultivate cannabis for sale in the adult-use market in an area of plant canopy that is equal to one-half of the area the business used to cultivate cannabis sold in the medical market in the preceding year. The office shall establish an annual verification and authorization procedure. The office may increase the area of plant canopy in which a medical cannabis combination business is authorized to cultivate cannabis for sale in the adult-use market between authorization periods if the business demonstrates a significant increase in the sale of medical cannabis and medical cannabis products. deleted text end new text begin (e) A cannabis macrobusiness with a cannabis cultivation endorsement and a retail operations endorsement may package and label adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale to customers. new text end new text begin (f) A cannabis macrobusiness with a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement and a medical cannabis retail endorsement may package and label medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products for sale to patients enrolled in the registry program; registered designated caregivers; and parents, legal guardians, and spouses of an enrolled patient. new text end Subd. 3. deleted text begin Manufacturingdeleted text end new text begin Manufacturer endorsementnew text end ; size limitations. new text begin (a) By rule, new text end the office may establish limits on cannabis manufacturing that are consistent with the area of plant canopy a business is authorized to cultivate.new text begin Until the office establishes limits by rule, a cannabis macrobusiness must not use more than 90,000 pounds of cannabis or its dry-weight equivalent of raw concentrates to manufacture cannabis products.new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis macrobusiness must apply for and obtain a medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement and must comply with section 342.51, subdivision 1c. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis macrobusiness may apply for and obtain one or more cannabis manufacturer endorsements identified in section 342.26. new text end Subd. 4. Retailnew text begin operationsnew text end new text begin endorsement;new text end locations. new text begin (a) new text end A deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusiness with a retail operations endorsementnew text end may operate up to deleted text begin one retail location in each congressional district. A medical cannabis combination business must offer medical cannabis flower, medical cannabinoid products, or both at every retail location.deleted text end new text begin eight retail locations and, if operating more than five retail locations, must ensure that at least three retail locations are located in areas identified by the office as high medical need areas.new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis macrobusiness may apply for and obtain a retail operations endorsement and must comply with section 342.27. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis macrobusiness with a retail operations endorsement must apply for and obtain a medical cannabis retail operations endorsement and comply with section 342.51, subdivision 1d. new text end new text begin (d) A cannabis macrobusiness with a retail operations endorsement and a medical cannabis retail operations endorsement must carry and make available for sale, at each retail location, all high medical need products identified by the office. new text end Subd. 5. Failure to participate; suspension or revocation of license. The office may suspend or revoke a deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusiness new text end license if the office determines that the business is no longer actively participating in the medical cannabis market. deleted text begin The office may, by rule, establish minimum requirements related to cannabis cultivation, manufacturing of medical cannabinoid products, retail sales of medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products, and other relevant criteria to demonstrate active participation in the medical cannabis market.deleted text end new text begin If a cannabis macrobusiness fails to obtain or operate under a medical cannabis manufacturer endorsement or fails to carry and make available for sale, at each retail location, high medical need products identified by the office, the office may suspend or revoke the cannabis macrobusiness's license under this subdivision. new text end deleted text begin Subd. 6. deleted text end deleted text begin Operations. deleted text end deleted text begin A medical cannabis combination business must comply with the relevant requirements of sections 342.25, 342.26, 342.27, and 342.51, subdivisions 2 to 5. deleted text end Subd. 7. deleted text begin Transportationdeleted text end new text begin Internal transporter endorsementnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end maynew text begin obtain an internal transporter endorsement tonew text end transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer productsnew text begin between facilities owned by the license holdernew text end if the deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end : (1) provides the office with the information described in section 342.35, subdivision 2; and (2) complies with the requirements of section 342.36. new text begin (b) A cannabis macrobusiness with at least two medical cannabis endorsements may apply for and obtain an external transporter endorsement to transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products to other cannabis and hemp businesses if the cannabis macrobusiness: new text end new text begin (1) provides the office with the information required under section 342.35, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) complies with the requirements of section 342.36. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis macrobusiness with a medical cannabis endorsement is not required to obtain an external transporter endorsement to transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, medical cannabis flower, and medical cannabinoid products to a cannabis testing facility. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Multiple licenses. new text end new text begin (a) A person, cooperative, or business holding a cannabis macrobusiness license may also hold a cannabis event organizer license. new text end new text begin (b) Except as provided in paragraph (a), a person, cooperative, or business holding a cannabis macrobusiness license is prohibited from owning or operating any other cannabis business or hemp business or holding more than one cannabis macrobusiness license. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, a restriction on the number or type of licenses that a business may hold applies to every cooperative member or every director, manager, and general partner of a cannabis business. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Conversion of licenses. new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2027, the office must convert any existing medical cannabis combination business licenses to cannabis macrobusiness licenses. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the office may determine the number of available cannabis macrobusiness licenses for applicants who do not have an existing license under this chapter. The office must make the determination under this paragraph according to the requirements of section 342.14, subdivision 1a. If the office is accepting applications for cannabis macrobusiness licenses from applicants without an existing license under this chapter, the office must announce the number of cannabis macrobusiness licenses available and the date on which applications will be accepted. The number of licenses available to social equity applicants must be equal to or greater than the number of licenses available to all applicants. Applicants for cannabis macrobusiness licenses must comply with the application and licensing requirements of this chapter. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.61, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Testing of samples; disclosures. (a) On a schedule determined by the office, every cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler with an endorsement to import products, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end shall make each batch of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products grown, manufactured, or imported by the cannabis business or hemp business available to a cannabis testing facility. (b) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler with an endorsement to import products, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end must disclose all known information regarding pesticides, fertilizers, solvents, or other foreign materials, including but not limited to catalysts used in creating artificially derived cannabinoids, applied or added to the batch of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products subject to testing. Disclosure must be made to the cannabis testing facility and must include information about all applications by any person, whether intentional or accidental. (c) A deleted text begin cannabis businessdeleted text end new text begin license holdernew text end shall select one or more representative samples from each batch, test the samples for the presence of contaminants, and test the samples for potency and homogeneity and to allow the cannabis flower, cannabis product, artificially derived cannabinoid, lower-potency hemp edible, or hemp-derived consumer product to be accurately labeled with its cannabinoid profile. Testing for contaminants must include testing for residual solvents, foreign material, microbiological contaminants, heavy metals, pesticide residue, mycotoxins, and any items identified pursuant to paragraph (b), and may include testing for other contaminants. A cannabis testing facility must destroy or return to the deleted text begin cannabis business or hemp businessdeleted text end new text begin license holdernew text end any part of the sample that remains after testing. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.61, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Test results. (a) If a sample meets the applicable testing standards, a cannabis testing facility shall issue a certification to a cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler with an endorsement to import products, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end and the cannabis business or hemp business may then sell or transfer the batch of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products from which the sample was taken to another cannabis business or hemp business, or offer the cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products for sale to customers or patients. If a sample does not meet the applicable testing standards or if the testing facility is unable to test for a substance identified pursuant to subdivision 4, paragraph (b), the batch from which the sample was taken shall be subject to procedures established by the office for such batches, including destruction, remediation, or retesting. (b) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler with an endorsement to import products, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end must maintain the test results for cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products grown, manufactured, or imported by that cannabis business or hemp business for at least five years after the date of testing. (c) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler with an endorsement to import products, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end shall make test results maintained by that cannabis business or hemp business available for review by any member of the public, upon request. Test results made available to the public must be in plain language. Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.63, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Content of label; cannabis. All cannabis flower and hemp-derived consumer products that consist of hemp plant parts sold to customers or patients must have affixed on the packaging or container of the cannabis flower or hemp-derived consumer product a label that contains at least the following information: (1) the name and license number of the cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end , or industrial hemp grower where the cannabis flower or hemp plant part was cultivated; (2) the net weight of cannabis flower or hemp plant parts in the package or container; (3) the batch number; (4) the cannabinoid profile; (5) a universal symbol established by the office indicating that the package or container contains cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, or a hemp-derived consumer product; (6) verification that the cannabis flower or hemp plant part was tested according to section 342.61 and that the cannabis flower or hemp plant part complies with the applicable standards; (7) information on the usage of the cannabis flower or hemp-derived consumer product; (8) the following statement: "Keep this product out of reach of children."; and (9) any other statements or information required by the office. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.63, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Content of label; cannabinoid products. (a) All cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp concentrate, hemp-derived consumer products other than products subject to the requirements under subdivision 2, medical cannabinoid products, and hemp-derived topical products sold to customers or patients must have affixed to the packaging or container of the cannabis product a label that contains at least the following information: (1) the name and license number of the cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis cultivator, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end , or industrial hemp grower that cultivated the cannabis flower or hemp plant parts used in the cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, hemp-derived consumer product, or medical cannabinoid product; (2) the name and license number of the cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis manufacturer, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end , or industrial hemp grower that manufactured the cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, or artificially derived cannabinoid and, if different, the name and license number of the cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis manufacturer, lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end that manufactured the product; (3) the net weight of the cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, or hemp-derived consumer product in the package or container; (4) the type of cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, or hemp-derived consumer product; (5) the batch number; (6) the serving size; (7) the cannabinoid profile per serving and in total; (8) a list of ingredients; (9) a universal symbol established by the office indicating that the package or container contains cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, or a hemp-derived consumer product; (10) a warning symbol developed by the office in consultation with the commissioner of health and the Minnesota Poison Control System that: (i) is at least three-quarters of an inch tall and six-tenths of an inch wide; (ii) is in a highly visible color; (iii) includes a visual element that is commonly understood to mean a person should stop; (iv) indicates that the product is not for children; and (v) includes the phone number of the Minnesota Poison Control System; (11) verification that the cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, hemp-derived consumer product, or medical cannabinoid product was tested according to section 342.61 and that the cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, hemp-derived consumer product, or medical cannabinoid product complies with the applicable standards; (12) information on the usage of the product; (13) the following statement: "Keep this product out of reach of children."; and (14) any other statements or information required by the office. (b) The office may by rule establish alternative labeling requirements for lower-potency hemp edibles that are imported into the state if those requirements provide consumers with information that is substantially similar to the information described in paragraph (a). Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.63, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Additional content of label; medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products. In addition to the applicable requirements for labeling under subdivision 2 or 3, all medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products must include at least the following information on the label affixed to the packaging or container of the medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid product: (1) the patient's name and date of birth; (2) new text begin if applicable, new text end the name and date of birth of the patient's registered designated caregiver or, if listed on the registry verification, the name of the patient's parent, legal guardian, or spousedeleted text begin , if applicabledeleted text end ; and (3) the patient's registry identification number. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.63, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Additional information. (a) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis retailer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end must provide customers and patients with the following information: (1) factual information about impairment effects and the expected timing of impairment effects, side effects, adverse effects, and health risks of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products; (2) a statement that customers and patients must not operate a motor vehicle or heavy machinery while under the influence of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products; (3) resources customers and patients may consult to answer questions about cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products, and any side effects and adverse effects; (4) contact information for the poison control center and a safety hotline or website for customers to report and obtain advice about side effects and adverse effects of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products; (5) substance use disorder treatment options; and (6) any other information specified by the office. (b) A cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis retailer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end may include the information described in paragraph (a) by: (1) including the information on the label affixed to the packaging or container of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products; (2) posting the information in the premises of the cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis retailer, or deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end ; or (3) providing the information on a separate document or pamphlet provided to customers or patients when the customer purchases cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, or a hemp-derived consumer product. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.80, is amended to read: 342.80 LAWFUL ACTIVITIES. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the cultivation, manufacturing, possessing, and selling of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products by a licensed cannabis business or hemp business in conformity with the rights granted by a cannabis business license or hemp business license is lawful and may not be the grounds for the seizure or forfeiture of property, arrest or prosecution, or search or inspections except as provided by this chapter. (b) A person acting as an agent of a cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness, cannabis retailer, deleted text begin medicaldeleted text end cannabis deleted text begin combination businessdeleted text end new text begin macrobusinessnew text end , or lower-potency hemp edible retailer who sells or otherwise transfers cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to a person under 21 years of age is not subject to arrest, prosecution, or forfeiture of property if the person complied with section 342.27, subdivision 4, and any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter. Sec. 34. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 342.515, as section 342.295 and make any necessary cross-reference changes consistent with this renumbering. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 35. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.51, subdivision 1, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08065 342.51 MEDICAL CANNABIS ENDORSEMENTS. Subdivision 1. Endorsement; authorized actions. (a) The office may issue a medical cannabis endorsement to a cannabis business authorizing the business to: (1) cultivate medical cannabis; (2) process medical cannabinoid products; or (3) sell or distribute medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products to any person authorized to receive medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products. (b) The office must issue a medical cannabis cultivation endorsement to a cannabis license holder if the license holder: (1) is authorized to cultivate cannabis; (2) submits a medical cannabis endorsement application to the office; and (3) otherwise meets all applicable requirements established by the office. (c) A medical cannabis cultivation endorsement entitles the license holder to grow cannabis plants within the approved amount of space from seed or immature plant to mature plant, harvest cannabis flower from a mature plant, package and label cannabis flower as medical cannabis flower, sell medical cannabis flower to cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis endorsement, and perform other actions approved by the office. (d) The office must issue a medical cannabis processor endorsement to a cannabis license holder if the license holder: (1) is authorized to manufacture cannabis products; (2) submits a medical cannabis endorsement application to the office; and (3) otherwise meets all applicable requirements established by the office. (e) A medical cannabis processor endorsement entitles the license holder to: (1) purchase medical cannabis flower, medical cannabinoid products, hemp plant parts, and hemp concentrate from cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis cultivator endorsement or a medical cannabis processor endorsement; (2) purchase hemp plant parts from industrial hemp growers; (3) make cannabis concentrate from medical cannabis flower; (4) make hemp concentrate, including hemp concentrate with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of more than 0.3 percent as measured by weight; (5) manufacture medical cannabinoid products; (6) package and label medical cannabinoid products for sale to cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis processer endorsement or a medical cannabis retailer endorsement; and (7) perform other actions approved by the office. (f) The office must issue a medical cannabis retailer endorsement to a cannabis license holder if the license holder: (1) submits a medical cannabis retail endorsement application to the office; (2) has at least one employee who earned a medical cannabis consultant certificate issued by the office and has completed the required training or has at least one employee who is a licensed pharmacist under chapter 151; and (3) otherwise meets all applicable requirements established by the office. (g) A medical cannabis retail endorsement entitles the license holder to purchase medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products from cannabis businesses with medical cannabis cultivator endorsements and medical cannabis processor endorsements, and sell or distribute medical cannabis flower, medical cannabinoid products, and associated paraphernalia to any person authorized to receive medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products. (h) A medical cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement must verify that all medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products have passed safety, potency, and consistency testing at a cannabis testing facility approved by the office for the testing of medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products before the cannabis business with a medical cannabis retail endorsement may distribute the medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid product to any person enrolled in the registry program.